Hawaii, session 2026, SB397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 390-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "employer" to read as follows: ""Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, corporation, the personal representative of the estate of a deceased individual or the receiver, trustee, or successor of any of the same, employing any person[, but shall not include the State or any political subdivision thereof or the United States]." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________